Massachusetts, session 194th, S2078.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of Chapter 64H of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022 edition is hereby
amended, in clause (l), by inserting after the word “insulin;” in line 195, the following words:-
sales of blood test strips and lancets; sales of vitamin and mineral supplements when prescribed
by a licensed physician;
of 1